Maine, session 132, LD1664.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5219-AAA, sub-§1, ¶I, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. J,
§13, is amended to read:
I. "Layoff" means a reduction in workforce at a qualified business with 20 or more
persons employed during any one of the preceding 4 quarters that results in an
employment loss for at least 2 consecutive months within the same tax year of at least
20% of the qualified business's employees in this State. "Layoff" does not mean a
reduction in workforce due to a catastrophic event or due to a restriction on the weight
or passage of any vehicle over any way by the Department of Transportation pursuant
to Title 29-A, section 2395.
Page 1 - 132LR1801(03)